Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 21 Division of Developmental Disabilities

40.1-21-1.
Developmental disabilities services.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be required to plan, develop, coordinate, and administer a complete, comprehensive, and integrated statewide program for developmentally disabled adults.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

23-43-1

; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-2.
Division of developmental disabilities established.

There shall be established a division of developmental disabilities within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals to carry out the intent and purposes of this chapter. There shall be an executive director of the division of developmental disabilities within the department who shall serve as the chief executive of the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-2; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 120, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-2.1.
Change of former name.

Whenever in any existing law, regulation, or document, reference is made to the “division of retardation and developmental disabilities,” the term “division of developmental disabilities” shall be used in lieu thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 120, § 6.

40.1-21-3 — 40.1-21-3.2.
[Repealed.]

40.1-21-4.
Powers and duties of director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall be responsible for planning and developing a complete, comprehensive, and integrated statewide program for the developmentally disabled; for the implementation of the program; and for the coordination of the efforts of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals with those of other state departments and agencies, municipal governments, as well as the federal government and private agencies concerned with and providing services for the developmentally disabled.

The director shall be responsible for the administration and operation of all state-operated community and residential facilities established for the diagnosis, care, and training of the developmentally disabled. The director shall be responsible for establishing standards in conformance with generally accepted professional thought and for providing technical assistance to all state-supported and licensed habilitative, developmental, residential, and other facilities for the developmentally disabled, and exercise the requisite surveillance and inspection to ensure compliance with standards. Provided, however, that none of the foregoing shall be applicable to any of the facilities wholly within the control of any other department of state government.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall stimulate research by public and private agencies, institutions of higher learning, and hospitals in the interest of the elimination and amelioration of developmental disabilities and care and training of the developmentally disabled.

The director shall be responsible for the development of criteria as to the eligibility for admittance of any developmentally disabled person for residential care in any department-supported and licensed residential facility or agency.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may transfer developmentally disabled adults from one state residential facility to another when deemed necessary or desirable for their better care and welfare.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall make grants-in-aid and otherwise provide financial assistance to the various communities and private nonprofit agencies, in amounts that will enable all developmentally disabled adults to receive developmental and other services appropriate to their individual needs.

The director shall coordinate all planning for the construction of facilities for the developmentally disabled, and the expenditure of funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the state for this purpose.

To ensure individuals eligible for services under §

40.1-21-4.3

receive the appropriate medical benefits through the executive office of health and human services’ Medicaid program, the director, or designee, will work in coordination with the Medicaid program to determine if an individual is eligible for long-term-care services and supports and that he or she has the option to enroll in the Medicaid program that offers these services. As part of the monthly reporting requirements, the department will indicate how many individuals have declined enrollment in a managed care plan that offers these long-term-care services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 223, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-3; P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-4; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-21-4

; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 30; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 13, § 5.

40.1-21-4.1.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 158, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 3, effective January 1, 1988.

40.1-21-4.2.
Declaration of purpose.

There is presently no single state agency that provides or secures services that many developmentally disabled citizens may require. Therefore, the purposes of this chapter are as follows:

To establish a division of developmental disabilities within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals;

To advance the public interest, to promote, safeguard, and protect the human dignity, constitutional and statutory rights and liberties, social well-being, and general welfare of all developmentally disabled citizens of the state;

To provide or to secure certain social, protective, and other types of appropriate services for all developmentally disabled citizens;

To promote the coordination of all available services, both generic and specialized, for all developmentally disabled citizens under public and private auspices;

To ensure that all developmentally disabled adults in this state receive developmental, supportive, and ancillary services as prescribed in an individualized program plan, developed with the participation of the developmentally disabled person and his or her family or guardian or advocate; and

To promote a comprehensive system to support the families of developmentally disabled adults in their own homes and environments, and to encourage families to maintain their developmentally disabled relatives in their own homes when appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 4; P.L. 1993, ch. 120, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-4.3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter and in chapter 22 of this title the words:

“Ancillary services” means those services provided, and shall include, but not be limited to, transportation, housing, housing adaptation, personal attendant care, and homemaker services.

“Case management” means the implementation of an individual’s program by providing information, by referral to appropriate service providers, by procurement of services, and by the coordination of the necessary services.

“Department” means the Rhode Island department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Developmental services” means those services provided to developmentally disabled adults, and shall include, but not be limited to, habilitation and rehabilitation services, and day services.

“Developmentally disabled adult” means a person, eighteen (18) years old or older and not under the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth and families who is either a mentally retarded developmentally disabled adult or is a person with a severe, chronic disability that:

Is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mental and physical impairments;

Is manifested before the person attains age twenty-two (22);

Is likely to continue indefinitely;

Results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the following areas of major life activity:

Self care;

Receptive and expressive language;

Learning;

Mobility;

Self-direction;

Capacity for independent living;

Economic self-sufficiency; and

Reflects the person’s need for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or generic care, treatment, or other services that are of lifelong or extended duration and are individually planned and coordinated. For purposes of funding, it is understood that students enrolled in school will continue to receive education from their local education authority in accordance with §

16-24-1

et seq.

“Diagnosis and evaluation” means a process to determine whether and to what extent an individual is developmentally disabled and a study of the individual’s condition, situation, and needs that lead to a recommendation of what services, if any, would benefit the individual.

“Individualized program plan” or “general service plan” means a plan, however named, that includes, but shall not be limited to, the following:

An evaluation of the strengths, difficulties, needs, and goals of the individual;

A description of those services found to be necessary or appropriate to assist the individual in realizing his or her potential for self-sufficiency in major life activities;

A description of the agencies and/or individuals, who or that are proposed to provide each of the recommended services;

The intermediate and long-range objectives for the individual’s development and habilitation;

The expected duration for the provision of the services;

A description of the tests and other evaluative devices used and their results;

Proposed criteria for monitoring and evaluating the success of the services in meeting the individual’s needs; and

The signatures of the preparers of the plan and the date.

The individual program plan shall indicate developmental, supportive, or ancillary services by function and frequency, the manner of subsidy and delivery and the categories of need for services such as transportation, job training, or occupation, housing, housing adaptation, personal attendant care, homemaker, or other services. This plan shall be reviewed at least annually; provided, however, that authorizations for services and funding issued prior to July 1, 2011, are null and void. Authorizations will be paid at the rate effective in the quarter the service was provided.

“Mentally retarded developmentally disabled adult” means a person eighteen (18) years old or older and not under the jurisdiction of the department of children, youth and families, with significant sub-average, general intellectual functioning two (2) standard deviations below the norm, existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior and manifested during the developmental period. For purposes of funding, it is understood that students enrolled in school will continue to receive education from their local education authority in accordance with §

16-24-1

et seq.

“Service broker” means that individual who assists in facilitating the connection between the developmentally disabled person and the services required by the individual program plan.

“Subsidized access to service” means the provisions of financial resources through vouchers to a developmentally disabled person to enable the person to gain access to appropriate generic and/or special services as required by the individual program plan.

“Supportive services” means those services provided to developmentally disabled adults, and shall include, but not be limited to, occupational therapy, physical therapy, psychological services, counseling, nursing services, and medical services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 4; P.L. 1991, ch. 301, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 9, § 23.

40.1-21-4.4.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 244, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 11, effective June 26, 2008.

40.1-21-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-5; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 1995.

40.1-21-6.
The John E. Fogarty Institute of Rhode Island.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is hereby authorized and directed, within the funds currently available or to be made available in the future, to plan for and foster the establishment of a university-affiliated developmental disabilities center which shall be devoted, but not limited, to the education and training of personnel in all fields related to developmental disabilities and to research in developmental disabilities which shall be known as “The John E. Fogarty Institute of Rhode Island.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 223, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-4; P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-6; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-6.1.
Admission to developmental disabilities services.

Adults who are developmentally disabled shall be admitted for developmental disability services under the provisions of this chapter within the limit of available appropriations in accordance with the following procedures:

Any person believed to be developmentally disabled, a parent, guardian, relative, or advocate of the person may be referred or make written application to the department on forms provided by the department for diagnosis and evaluation.

After the identification diagnosis and evaluation is completed:

It shall be determined if the person is developmentally disabled, and, if so, the degree of impairment;

Recommendations shall be made as to what services, if any, the person requires; and

An individualized program plan for each adult, who is developmentally disabled, shall be established, and funding and case management or subsidized access with or without service brokerage shall be determined;

Every effort shall be made to involve the person who is developmentally disabled, his or her guardian, parent, relative, or advocate in the creation of the individualized program plan; and

Each person and his or her parent or guardian shall be provided a written copy of an approved, individualized program plan developed for the person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 110; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 110.

40.1-21-7.
Authority to lease.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

42-11-2

, the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may make available, on such terms and conditions and for such periods as it deems proper, facilities under its jurisdiction, or space therein, to affiliating institutions of higher learning and public and private nonprofit agencies, provided that the premises are utilized for direct or supportive services to the developmentally disabled and their families, and/or for education and training of any discipline concerned with the problems of developmental disabilities and/or research directed to the problems of developmental disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 223, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-5; P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-7; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-8.
Designation and assignment of functions and funds.

Whenever the duties of the head of any existing department, division, board, commission, or other agency or of any other officer are prescribed by law, and the duties of the person have been transferred by this chapter to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may designate some officer or other subordinate within the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals to perform the duties.

Upon the transfer of any functions of any department or agency to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals pursuant to this chapter, the governor is authorized to transfer or reallocate, in whole or part, by executive order, the appropriations affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 223, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-6; P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-8; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2.

40.1-21-9.
Transfer of records.

Unless otherwise expressly provided by this chapter, the head of a department, division, or other administrative agency, whose functions, powers, and duties are assigned and transferred by this chapter to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, shall deliver to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals all contracts, books, maps, plans, papers, records, and property of every description that is within the jurisdiction or control of the head of a department, division, or other administrative agency. The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals is hereby authorized to take possession thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 223, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-7; P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-9; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2.

40.1-21-10.
Appropriations.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate such sums as it deems necessary to enable the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals to provide or secure services for developmentally disabled adults of this state; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of such sum or sums, or so much thereof as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by him or her of vouchers properly authenticated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-10; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-11.
References to director or assistant director of social welfare.

Whenever, in any general or special law, reference is or shall be made to the director of social welfare or the assistant director of social welfare for curative services pertaining to the Doctor Joseph H. Ladd Center, programs, and services for people who are mentally retarded, the reference shall mean, and be construed to mean, the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-11; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 110; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 110.

40.1-21-12.
Rules and regulations.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, after consultation with the Rhode Island developmental disabilities council, shall make and promulgate such rules and regulations pertaining to services for developmentally disabled adults as specified in this chapter when the services are provided in whole or in part by the use of state and/or federal funds earmarked for developmentally disabled persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 178, § 1; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, § 23-43-12; P.L. 1979, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-13.
Other obligations.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any agency, state or local, from its obligations to provide services to the developmentally disabled citizens of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 181, § 4; P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1.

40.1-21-14.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 120, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 1995, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 1995.

40.1-21-15.
Self-sufficiency trust fund.

There is hereby created the self-sufficiency trust fund. The state treasurer, ex officio, shall be custodian of the trust fund, and the controller shall direct payments from the trust fund upon vouchers properly certified by the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The treasurer shall credit interest on the trust fund to the trust fund, and the director shall allocate the interest pro rate to the respective accounts of the named beneficiaries of the trust fund. For the purposes of this section, the term “self-sufficiency trust” means a trust created by a nonprofit corporation that is a 501(c)(3) organization under the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1954, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), and that was organized under the Nonprofit Corporation Act, chapter 6 of title 7, for the purpose of providing for the care or treatment of one or more persons with disabilities or persons otherwise eligible for department services.

The department shall adopt rules and procedures under the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of title 42, as may be necessary or useful for the administration of the trust fund.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 110; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 110.

40.1-21-16.
Administration of self-sufficiency trust fund.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals may accept money from a self-sufficiency trust for deposit in the trust fund pursuant to an agreement with the trust naming one or more beneficiaries who are persons with disabilities or persons otherwise eligible for department services residing in this state and specifying the care or treatment to be provided for them. The department shall maintain a separate account in the trust fund for each named beneficiary.

The money in these accounts shall be spent by the department, pursuant to its rules, only to provide care and treatment for the named beneficiaries in accordance with the terms of the agreement.

In the event that the director determines that the money in the account of a named beneficiary cannot be used for the care or treatment of the beneficiary in a manner consistent with the rules of the department and the agreement, or upon request of the self-sufficiency trust, the remaining money in that account, together with any accumulated interest on that account, shall be promptly returned to the self-sufficiency trust that deposited the money in the trust fund.

The receipt by a beneficiary of money from the trust fund or of care or treatment provided with that money, shall not in any way reduce, impair, or diminish the benefits to which the beneficiary is otherwise entitled by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 110; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 110.

40.1-21-17.
Special restricted fund.

The fund for persons who are disabled is created as a special restricted-receipt fund from the state treasury. The director may accept money from any source for deposit into the fund. The money in the fund shall be used by the department, subject to an appropriation, for the purpose of providing for the care and treatment of low-income persons with disabilities or low-income persons otherwise eligible for department services, as defined by the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 436, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 110; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 110.

40.1-21-18.
Release of grant-agreement liens.

The department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall discharge and file releases of grant-agreement liens in the land evidence records of the municipality where the real estate is located, entered into between the department and providers of services for individuals with developmental disabilities prior to July 1, 2008. The department shall waive any and all right, title, and interest in and to any and all properties where grants are in place. Provided, however, each provider of services for individuals with developmental disabilities shall demonstrate that the release of grant-agreement liens, and revenue generated as a direct result thereof, will be applied to community-based services for persons with developmental disabilities pursuant to a plan submitted to the department. The approval by the department for the discharge and release of liens shall not be unreasonably withheld. Nothing herein shall be construed to release the department’s interest in a home owned by the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 39, § 1.